src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_FSH
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} N_KUDO-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft}  NMN_DEF_SG_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft}  NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%^H  NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft}  N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft}%>{оеэØ} DIAL-NW-WITH-ST-AFTER-STEM ;

LEXICON N_TENGUSH
+Err/Orth-front-linking-vowel:{frontSoft} N_OSH ;
 N_OSH ;

LEXICON N_LESHCH
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} CMP-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_PLASHCH
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;


LEXICON N_OZKS_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_OZKS ;
LEXICON N_OZKS_errorth
+Err/Orth: N_OZKS ;
LEXICON N_OZKS_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OZKS ;
LEXICON N_BZ_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OZKS ;
LEXICON N_OZKS
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%>{оеэØ} DIAL-NW-WITH-ST-AFTER-STEM ;

LEXICON N_KARDAZ !! кардаз:карда
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%>{оеэØ} DIAL-NW-WITH-ST-AFTER-STEM ;

LEXICON N_FZ_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_LEVKS ;
LEXICON N_FS_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_LEVKS ;
LEXICON N_LEVKS_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_LEVKS ;
LEXICON N_RELAT_LEVKS
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_LEVKS ;
LEXICON N_LEVKS
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%>{оеэØ}{frontHard} DIAL-NW-WITH-ST-AFTER-STEM ;

LEXICON N_S1_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_ROZ1 ;
LEXICON N_ROZ1_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_ROZ1 ;
LEXICON N_ROZ1_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_ROZ1 ;

LEXICON N_ROZ1
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%>{оеэØ} DIAL-NW-WITH-ST-AFTER-STEM ;

LEXICON N_IE
:е N_VELE ;
@U.CX.NOM@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pl+Nom+Indef:@U.CX.NOM@йть K ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@P.POS.N@й NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;

LEXICON N_LAVSHO
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@{backHard} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@о{back} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@о{back} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PANGO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@е%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KECHE
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@е{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@е{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@е%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KENZHE
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@е{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@е{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@е%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_TESHTE
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@%^Ь2ZEROе{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%^Ь2ZEROе{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%^Ь2ZEROи%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_TINGE
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@е{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@е{frontSoft} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@е%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_TINGE-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@е NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _PANGO-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_CHUVTO
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{backHard} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@о{back} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@о{back} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PANGO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@ы%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_PANGO
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_PANGO ;
LEXICON N_PANGO
!! панго:панг
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{back} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@о NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@о NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@и%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@о LAT-INDEF ;


LEXICON N_POTMO
!! потмо:пот
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{back} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@мо NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@мо NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@ми%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@мо LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON DV-N_
+NomAct: N_KUDO ;! this provides background

! This might be moved to exceptions 2012-11-21
LEXICON N_KI
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KI ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@+Dimin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
LEXICON N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@+Dimin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_VELE_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_VELE ;
LEXICON N_VELE_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VELE ;
LEXICON N_VELE_rusmyv
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VELE ;
LEXICON N_RELAT_VELE
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_VELE ;
LEXICON N_VELE
!! Front vowel, palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_VELE ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_VELE ;

LEXICON N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@+Dimin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
LEXICON N_PIZE2
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KUDO_rus100_hasnat
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KUDO_errorth
+Err/Orth: N_KUDO ;
LEXICON N_KUDO_rusmyv
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KUDO ;
LEXICON N_KUDO_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KUDO
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KUDO-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _KUDO-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_AVIDEM
!! Does this need a diminutive?
@P.POS.N@+AssocColl:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;


!! NMN
LEXICON NMN_KAL
 N_KUDO-Derivation ;
 N_KAL-Def-Declension ;
 _KAL-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;
