src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
бараннэ:бараннэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
бизьгатат:бизьгата N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
билетке:билетке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
благовещения:благовещения N_KUDO  "" ;
вальмапелцят:вальма#пелця N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
вармасёлмо:варма#сёлм N_PANGO  "" ;
васолкс:васолкс N_OZKS  "etäisyys" ;
вашине:вашине N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ведьме:ведьме N_VELE  "hihna" ;
ведьпанкске:ведь#панкске N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
ведьпеште:ведьпешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
верьгизнэ:верьгизнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
верьнешке:верь#нешк N_TINGE  "" ;
вешевкс:вешевкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
воспаления:воспаления N_KUDO  "tulehdus" ;
граблят:грабля N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
губорькске:губорькске N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
дулапотмо:дулапотм N_PANGO  "" ;
дёго:дёго N_KUDO  "" ;
зыяннэ:зыяннэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
иваси:иваси N_VELE  "" ;
ие:и N_IE  "vuosi" ;
изавкс:изавкс N_OZKS  "äestetty pelto" ;
ильведевкс:ильведевкс N_LEVKS  "virhe" ;
ишмеэльде:ишмеэльдь N_TESHTE  "" ;
каворне:каворне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
каворьске:каворьске N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
кардазкуншка:кардазкуншка N_KUDO  "" ;
карьолго:карь#олг N_PANGO  "" ;
карьпилекс:карь#пилекс N_LEVKS  "" ;
кашапизэ:кашапизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
кевкат:кевка N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
кевпинге:кев#пинг N_TINGE  "" ;
кедьпеште:кедьпешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
кекшненесэ:кекшненесэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
кенкшкурго:кенкш#кург N_PANGO  "" ;
керясьтикше:керясьтикше N_VELE  "" ;
кесакке:кесакке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
ки:ки N_KI  "koi" ;
кирдема:кирдема DV-N_  "kärsivällisyys" ;
кирнэвкс:кирнэвкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
кискаваце:киска#ваць N_TESHTE  "" ;
киштипильге:киштипильг N_TINGE  "" ;
кодавкс:кодавкс N_OZKS  "" ;
коткудавпизэ:коткудав#пизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
котыне:котыне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
котёлнэ:котёлнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
коцтке:коцтке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
кудояксярго:кудояксярг N_PANGO  "" ;
кундавкс:кундавкс N_OZKS  "" ;
куярнэ:куярнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
кшичевтекс:кшичевтекс N_LEVKS  "" ;
латкочувто:латкочувт N_PANGO  "" ;
латочире:латочире N_VELE  "" ;
лезэ:лезэ N_PIZE2  "hyöty" ;
лейпря:лей#пря N_KUDO  "" ;
лекшат:лекша N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
лияназсэльге:лияназсэльг N_TINGE  "" ;
мекшке:мекшке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
мекшпизэ:мекшпизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
мелькть:мельк N_TINGE-PL  "(mon.) keuhkot" ;
мельне:мельне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
меште:мешть N_TESHTE  "rinta" ;
мизолкс:мизолкс N_OZKS  "hymy" ;
модапеште:модапешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
мукорекс:мукорекс N_LEVKS  "" ;
мурзанизэ:мурзанизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
недлячи:недлячи N_VELE  "" ;
нешке:нешк N_TINGE  "mehiläispesä" ;
нулко:нулк N_PANGO  "rähmä (silmässä)" ;
ождят:ождя N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
озавкс:озавкс N_OZKS  "sakka" ;
окульця:окульця N_KUDO  "" ;
пазнэ:пазнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
паксямеште:пакся#мешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
парсейне:парсейне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
пежетьке:пежетьке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
пелечи:пелечи N_VELE  "" ;
пелькакенже:пелька#кенж N_TINGE  "" ;
печкевкс:печкевкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
пешксесэ:пешксесэ N_PIZE2  "raskaana oleva (nainen)" ;
пизёлчувто:пизёл#чувт N_PANGO  "" ;
пилепоте:пиле#поть N_TESHTE  "" ;
покайтаргавкс:покайтаргавкс N_OZKS  "" ;
поляныне:поляныне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
пондопеке:пондопек N_TINGE  "" ;
потмоцепкеть:потмо#цепке N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
противоядия:противоядия N_KUDO  "" ;
пськинэвкс:пськинэвкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
путькавкс:путькавкс N_OZKS  "" ;
ралли:ралли N_VELE  "" ;
раське:раськ N_TINGE  "suku" ;
рогапеште:рогапешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
салнэ:салнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
сильге:сильг N_TINGE  "syylä" ;
столанго:столанг N_PANGO  "" ;
столэкшэ:столэкшэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
сувлевкс:сувлевкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
сувозейне:сувозейне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
судопаця:судопаця N_KUDO  "" ;
суманнеть:суманнеть N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
сундукке:сундукке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
ськамоксчи:ськамоксчи N_VELE  "" ;
сюровидьме:сюровидьм N_TINGE  "" ;
таргавкс:таргавкс N_OZKS  "tumppi" ;
тетидем:тетиде N_AVIDEM  "" ;
тетидень:тетидень N_AVIDEM  "" ;
толгине:толгине N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
уголнэ:уголнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
умарьчувто:умарь#чувт N_PANGO  "" ;
цецячине:цеця#чине N_VELE  "" ;
чакаемка:чакаемка N_KUDO  "" ;
чалгамот:чалгамо N_KUDO-PL  "pellavaloukku" ;
чаманеевкс:чама#неевкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
чувтотёкшке:чувто#тёкшке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
шкавкс:шкавкс N_OZKS  "nurmikka" ;
эзнэ:эзнэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
эльде:эльдь N_TESHTE  "tamma" ;
эрьмине:эрьмине N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
юткочи:ютко#чи N_VELE  "" ;
ямнэ:ямне N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
